Utah statutes.
72-7-515.   Utah-Federal Agreement -- Severability clause.
(1)  As used in this section, "Utah-Federal Agreement" means the agreement
relating to outdoor advertising that is described under Section 72-7-501, and
it includes any modifications to the agreement that are signed on behalf of
both the state and the United States Secretary of Transportation.
(2)  The provisions of this part are subject to and shall be superseded by
conflicting provisions of the Utah-Federal Agreement.
(3)  If any provision of this part or its application to any person or
circumstance is found to be unconstitutional, or in conflict with or
superseded by the Utah-Federal Agreement, the remainder of this part and the
application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be
affected by it.
